Illinois, session 104th, SB1800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-103 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-103)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-103)7    Sec. 6-103. What persons shall not be licensed as drivers 8or granted permits. The Secretary of State shall not issue, 9renew, or allow the retention of any driver's license nor 10issue any permit under this Code:11        1. To any person, as a driver, who is under the age of 12    18 years except as provided in Section 6-107, and except 13    that an instruction permit may be issued under Section 14    6-107.1 to a child who is not less than 15 years of age if 15    the child receives permission from a driver education 16    teacher or administrator from a school offering is 17    enrolled in an approved driver education course as defined 18    in Section 1-103 of this Code and requires an instruction 19    permit to participate therein, except that an instruction 20    permit may be issued under the provisions of Section 21    6-107.1 to a child who is 17 years and 3 months of age 22    without the child having enrolled in an approved driver 23    education course and except that an instruction permit may   SB1800- 2 -LRB104 10123 LNS 20195 b1    be issued to a child who is at least 15 years and 3 months 2    of age, is enrolled in school, meets the educational 3    requirements of the Driver Education Act, and has passed 4    examinations the Secretary of State in his or her 5    discretion may prescribe;6        1.5. To any person at least 18 years of age but less 7    than 21 years of age unless the person has, in addition to 8    any other requirements of this Code, successfully 9    completed an adult driver education course as provided in 10    Section 6-107.5 of this Code; 11        2. To any person who is under the age of 18 as an 12    operator of a motorcycle other than a motor driven cycle 13    unless the person has, in addition to meeting the 14    provisions of Section 6-107 of this Code, successfully 15    completed a motorcycle training course approved by the 16    Illinois Department of Transportation;17        3. To any person, as a driver, whose driver's license 18    or permit has been suspended, during the suspension, nor 19    to any person whose driver's license or permit has been 20    revoked, except as provided in Sections 6-205, 6-206, and 21    6-208;22        4. To any person, as a driver, who is a user of alcohol 23    or any other drug to a degree that renders the person 24    incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;25        5. To any person, as a driver, who has previously been 26    adjudged to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental   SB1800- 3 -LRB104 10123 LNS 20195 b1    or physical disability or disease and who has not at the 2    time of application been restored to competency by the 3    methods provided by law;4        6. To any person, as a driver, who is required by the 5    Secretary of State to submit an alcohol and drug 6    evaluation or take an examination provided for in this 7    Code unless the person has successfully passed the 8    examination and submitted any required evaluation;9        7. To any person who is required under the provisions 10    of the laws of this State to deposit security or proof of 11    financial responsibility and who has not deposited the 12    security or proof;13        8. To any person when the Secretary of State has good 14    cause to believe that the person by reason of physical or 15    mental disability would not be able to safely operate a 16    motor vehicle upon the highways, unless the person shall 17    furnish to the Secretary of State a verified written 18    statement, acceptable to the Secretary of State, from a 19    competent medical specialist, a licensed physician 20    assistant, or a licensed advanced practice registered 21    nurse, to the effect that the operation of a motor vehicle 22    by the person would not be inimical to the public safety;23        9. To any person, as a driver, who is 69 years of age 24    or older, unless the person has successfully complied with 25    the provisions of Section 6-109;26        10. To any person convicted, within 12 months of   SB1800- 4 -LRB104 10123 LNS 20195 b1    application for a license, of any of the sexual offenses 2    enumerated in paragraph 2 of subsection (b) of Section 3    6-205;4        11. To any person who is under the age of 21 years with 5    a classification prohibited in paragraph (b) of Section 6    6-104 and to any person who is under the age of 18 years 7    with a classification prohibited in paragraph (c) of 8    Section 6-104;9        12. To any person who has been either convicted of or 10    adjudicated under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 based 11    upon a violation of the Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois 12    Controlled Substances Act, or the Methamphetamine Control 13    and Community Protection Act while that person was in 14    actual physical control of a motor vehicle. For purposes 15    of this Section, any person placed on probation under 16    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 17    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or Section 70 of the 18    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act shall 19    not be considered convicted. Any person found guilty of 20    this offense, while in actual physical control of a motor 21    vehicle, shall have an entry made in the court record by 22    the judge that this offense did occur while the person was 23    in actual physical control of a motor vehicle and order 24    the clerk of the court to report the violation to the 25    Secretary of State as such. The Secretary of State shall 26    not issue a new license or permit for a period of one year;  SB1800- 5 -LRB104 10123 LNS 20195 b1        13. To any person who is under the age of 18 years and 2    who has committed the offense of operating a motor vehicle 3    without a valid license or permit in violation of Section 4    6-101 or a similar out-of-state offense;5        14. To any person who is 90 days or more delinquent in 6    court ordered child support payments or has been 7    adjudicated in arrears in an amount equal to 90 days' 8    obligation or more and who has been found in contempt of 9    court for failure to pay the support, subject to the 10    requirements and procedures of Article VII of Chapter 7 of 11    the Illinois Vehicle Code;12        14.5. To any person certified by the Illinois 13    Department of Healthcare and Family Services as being 90 14    days or more delinquent in payment of support under an 15    order of support entered by a court or administrative body 16    of this or any other State, subject to the requirements 17    and procedures of Article VII of Chapter 7 of this Code 18    regarding those certifications; 19        15. To any person released from a term of imprisonment 20    for violating Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 21    the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision of a law 22    of another state relating to reckless homicide or for 23    violating subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection 24    (d) of Section 11-501 of this Code relating to aggravated 25    driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 26    drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or any   SB1800- 6 -LRB104 10123 LNS 20195 b1    combination thereof, if the violation was the proximate 2    cause of a death, within 24 months of release from a term 3    of imprisonment; 4        16. To any person who, with intent to influence any 5    act related to the issuance of any driver's license or 6    permit, by an employee of the Secretary of State's Office, 7    or the owner or employee of any commercial driver training 8    school licensed by the Secretary of State, or any other 9    individual authorized by the laws of this State to give 10    driving instructions or administer all or part of a 11    driver's license examination, promises or tenders to that 12    person any property or personal advantage which that 13    person is not authorized by law to accept. Any persons 14    promising or tendering such property or personal advantage 15    shall be disqualified from holding any class of driver's 16    license or permit for 120 consecutive days. The Secretary 17    of State shall establish by rule the procedures for 18    implementing this period of disqualification and the 19    procedures by which persons so disqualified may obtain 20    administrative review of the decision to disqualify;21        17. To any person for whom the Secretary of State 22    cannot verify the accuracy of any information or 23    documentation submitted in application for a driver's 24    license;25        18. To any person who has been adjudicated under the 26    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 based upon an offense that is   SB1800- 7 -LRB104 10123 LNS 20195 b1    determined by the court to have been committed in 2    furtherance of the criminal activities of an organized 3    gang, as provided in Section 5-710 of that Act, and that 4    involved the operation or use of a motor vehicle or the use 5    of a driver's license or permit. The person shall be 6    denied a license or permit for the period determined by 7    the court; or 8        19. To any person who holds a REAL ID compliant 9    identification card or REAL ID compliant Person with a 10    Disability Identification Card issued under the Illinois 11    Identification Card Act. Any such person may, at his or 12    her discretion, surrender the REAL ID compliant 13    identification card or REAL ID compliant Person with a 14    Disability Identification Card in order to become eligible 15    to obtain a REAL ID compliant driver's license. 16    The Secretary of State shall retain all conviction 17information, if the information is required to be held 18confidential under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.19(Source: P.A. 103-162, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)